pt-PT: Forma do bolo: Bundt; Tipo pão; Mini; Retangular; Argola; Redondo; Tabuleiro; Quadrado; Árvore; Coroa; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika torte: Šarkelj; Štruca; Mini; Pravokotno; Obroč; Okroglo; Pekač; Kvadratno; Drevo; Venec; Drugo
de: Kuchenform: Gugelhupf; Kastenform; Mini; Rechteckig; Ring; Rund; Blech; Quadratisch; Baum; Kranz; Sonstige
vi: Hình dạng bánh: Bánh vòng (Bundt); Dạng ổ; Mini; Hình chữ nhật; Dạng vòng; Hình tròn; Dạng khay; Hình vuông; Hình cây; Vòng nguyệt quế; Khác
th: รูปทรงเค้ก: ทรงบันต์; ทรงโลฟ; มินิ; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงวงแหวน; ทรงกลม; ทรงถาด; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ทรงต้นไม้; ทรงพวงหรีด; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de pastel: Bundt; Molde alargado; Mini; Rectangular; Rosca; Redondo; Plancha; Cuadrado; Árbol; Corona; Otro
lt-LT: Pyrago forma: Kekso formos; Kepaliuko formos; Mini; Stačiakampio formos; Žiedo formos; Apvalus; Plokščias (skardos formos); Kvadratinis; Eglutės formos; Vainiko formos; Kita
tr: Kek şekli: Ortası delik; Somun; Mini; Dikdörtgen; Halka; Yuvarlak; Tepsi; Kare; Ağaç; Çelenk; Diğer
nb: Kakeformer: Randform; Brødform; Mini; Rektangulær; Ring; Rund; Langpanne; Kvadratisk; Tre; Krans; Annet
el: Σχήμα κέικ: Bundt; Μακρόστενο; Μίνι; Ορθογώνιο; Δακτύλιος; Στρογγυλό; Επίπεδο; Τετράγωνο; Δέντρο; Στεφάνι; Άλλο
zh-TW: 蛋糕形狀: 邦特; 長條; 迷你; 長方形; 環狀; 圓形; 平板; 方形; 樹形; 花圈形; 其他
nl: Cake vorm: Tulband; Broodvorm; Mini; Rechthoekig; Ringvormig; Rond; Plaatvormig; Vierkant; Boomvormig; Kransvormig; Overig
hr-HR: Shapestorti: Kuglof; Štruca; Mini; Pravokutni; Prsten; Okrugli; U limu; Kvadratni; Stablo; Vijenac; Ostalo
it: Shapesper torte: Ciambella / Bundt; Plumcake; Mini; Rettangolare; Ciambella; Rotondo; Teglia; Quadrato; Albero; Ghirlanda; Altro
fi: Kakun muoto: Torvikakku; Vuokakakku; Mini; Suorakulmainen; Rengas; Pyöreä; Levy; Neliö; Puu; Kranssi; Muu
zh-CN: 咖啡蛋糕造型: 咕咕霍夫形; 长条形; 迷你形; 长方形; 环形; 圆形; 烤盘形; 方形; 树形; 花环形; 其他
ru: Форма кекса: Кекс с отверстием; Прямоугольная (буханка); Мини; Прямоугольная; Кольцо; Круглая; Пласт; Квадратная; Елочка; Венок; Другое
bg-BG: Форма на сладкиша: Кекс (тип Bundt); Продълговат (тип хляб); Мини; Правоъгълен; Пръстен; Кръгъл; Плосък (Sheet); Квадратен; Елха; Венец; Други
da: Kageform: Randform; Brødform; Mini; Rektangulær; Ring; Rund; Bradepande; Firkantet; Træ; Krans; Andet
ro-RO: Formă prăjitură: Guguluf (Bundt); Chec; Mini; Dreptunghiulară; Inel; Rotundă; Tavă; Pătrată; Brad; Coroniță; Altele
fr: Forme du gâteau: Kouglof; Cake; Mini; Rectangulaire; Couronne; Rond; Plaque; Carré; Arbre; Couronne de Noël; Autre
sk-SK: Tvar torty: Bábovka; Bochník; Mini; Obdĺžnik; Prstenec; Kruh; Plech; Štvorec; Strom; Venec; Iné
sv: Tårtformer: Krans; Limpa; Mini; Rektangulär; Ring; Rund; Långpanna; Kvadratisk; Träd; Krans; Övrigt
hu: Tortaforma: Kuglóf; Kenyér forma; Mini; Téglalap; Gyűrű; Kerek; Tepsis; Szögletes; Fa; Koszorú; Egyéb
ko: 케이크 모양: 번트; 로프; 미니; 직사각형; 링; 원형; 시트; 사각형; 트리; 화환; 기타
ja: ケーキのShapes: バント; ローフ; ミニ; 長方形; リング; ラウンド; シート; スクエア; ツリー; リース; その他
pt-BR: Forma do bolo: Bundt; Bolo de forma; Mini; Retangular; Rosca; Redondo; Tabuleiro; Quadrado; Árvore; Guirlanda; Outro
cs: Tvar bábovky: Bábovka; Bochník; Mini; Obdélník; Kruh; Kulatý; Plech; Čtverec; Strom; Věnec; Jiný
pl: Kształt ciasta: Babka; Keksówka; Mini; Prostokątny; Pierścień; Okrągły; Z blachy; Kwadratowy; Drzewko; Wieniec; Inne
en: Cake shape: Bundt; Loaf; Mini; Rectangular; Ring; Round; Sheet; Square; Tree; Wreath; Other